Washington statutes.
RCW 6.27.280

Procedure upon failure of garnishee to deliver.

If the garnishee, adjudged to have effects or personal property of the defendant in possession or under control as provided in RCW 6.27.270, fails or refuses to deliver them to the sheriff on such demand, the officer shall immediately make return of such failure or refusal, whereupon, on motion of the plaintiff, the garnishee shall be cited to show cause why he or she should not be found in contempt of court for such failure or refusal, and should the garnishee fail to show some good and sufficient excuse for such failure and refusal, he or she shall be fined for such contempt and imprisoned until he or she shall deliver such personal property or effects.

[ 1987 c 442 s 1028; 1969 ex.s. c 264 s 23. Formerly RCW 7.33.230.]